Massachusetts, session 194th, S345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 93 to 96, the words "the lesser of: (i) the ratio of the 
value of the implicit price deflator for state and local government purchases in the third quarter 
of the prior fiscal year to its value in the third quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior; and (ii) 
1.045" and inserting in place thereof the following words: "the ratio of the value of the implicit 
price deflator for state and local government purchases in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year 
to its value in the third quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior."